Utah statutes.
4-23-7.   Annual fees on sheep, goats, cattle, and turkeys -- Determination
by board -- Collection methods.
(1)  To assist the department in meeting the annual expense of administering
this chapter, the following annual predator control fees are imposed upon
animals owned by persons whose interests this chapter is designed to protect:
Sheep and goats (except on farm dairy
goats or feeder lambs)........................................................
.................................at least $.60 but not
 more than $1 per head
Cattle (except on farm dairy
cattle)....................................................................at
least $.15 but not
 more than $.50 per head
Turkeys (breeding stock only).................................................
...........................at least $.05 but not
more than $.10 per head
(2)  The amount of the fees imposed upon each category of animals specified in
this section shall be determined by the board annually on or before January 1
of each year.
(3) (a)  Fee brand inspected cattle are subject to a predator control fee upon
change of ownership or slaughter.
(b)  The fee shall be collected by the local brand inspector at the time of
the inspection of cattle, or withheld and paid by the market from proceeds
derived from the sale of the cattle.
(c)  Cattle that are fee brand inspected prior to confinement to a feedlot are
not subject to any subsequent predator control fee.
(4) (a)  Fleece of sheared sheep is subject to a predator control fee upon
sale of the fleece.
(b) (i)  The fee shall be withheld and paid by the marketing agency or
purchaser of wool from proceeds derived from the sale of the fleece.
(ii)  The department shall enter into cooperative agreements with in-state and
out-of-state wool warehouses and wool processing facilities for the collection
of predator control fees on the fleece of sheep that graze on private or
public range in the state.
(c)  The fee shall be based on the number of pounds of wool divided by 10
pounds for white face sheep and five pounds for black face sheep.
(5)  Predator control fees on turkey breeding stock shall be paid by the
turkey cooperative.
(6) (a)  Livestock owners shall pay a predator control fee on any livestock
that uses public or private range in the state which is not otherwise subject
to the fee under Subsection (3) or (4).
(b)  By January 1, the commissioner shall mail to each owner of livestock
specified in  Subsection (6)(a) a reporting form requiring sufficient
information on the type and number of  livestock grazed in the state and
indicating the fee imposed for each category of livestock.
(c)  Each owner shall file the completed form and the appropriate fee with the
commissioner  before April 1.
(d)  If any person who receives the reporting form fails to return the
completed form and the imposed fee as required, the commissioner is authorized
to commence suit through the office of the attorney general, in a court of
competent jurisdiction, to collect the imposed fee, the amount of which shall
be as determined by the commissioner.
(7)  All fees collected under this section shall be remitted to the department
and deposited in the Agricultural and Wildlife Damage Prevention Account.
